Florida, session 2026, SB850.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âEffective January 1, 2027, section 500.072, 20 Florida Statutes, is created to read: 21 500.072âFortification of enriched grain products.â 22 (1)(a)âThe Legislature finds that: 23 1.âNeural tube defects, including spina bifida and 24 anencephaly, are serious birth defects of the brain and spine 25 which occur early in pregnancy and cause lifelong disability and 26 substantial health care costs. 27 2.âThe United States Food and Drug Administration mandated 28 folic acid fortification of wheat flour and other grain products 29 in 1996, leading to a significant reduction in rates of neural 30 tube defects nationally. 31 3.âMinority populations in this state disproportionately 32 consume corn masa and white rice, which are not consistently 33 fortified with folic acid, contributing to persistently higher 34 rates of neural tube defects among these populations. 35 4.âIn this state, an average of 2.5 cases of spina bifida 36 per 10,000 live births were reported from 2016 to 2021, with 37 Hernando, Escambia, and Marion Counties exceeding state averages 38 with 8.9 cases, 6.3 cases, and 5.8 cases per 10,000 live births, 39 respectively. 40 5.âEach case of spina bifida carries an estimated lifetime 41 medical and social cost of $800,000 to $1.4 million, much of 42 which is borne by Florida Medicaid and other public programs. 43 6.âFortifying grain products with folic acid is a proven, 44 cost-effective preventive measure that can avert cases of neural 45 tube defects, reduce long-term public expenditures related to 46 such defects, and promote health across communities in this 47 state. 48 7.âEarly folic acid intake has been associated with reduced 49 risk for certain neurodevelopmental conditions, adding further 50 potential public health benefit. 51 (b)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to reduce the 52 incidence of neural tube defects and increase vitamin intake 53 across this state in order to decrease the public health and 54 fiscal burden associated with preventable birth defects and 55 other associated negative health outcomes. 56 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 57 (a)ââCorn masaâ means a doughlike food product made from 58 corn that has undergone nixtamalization. 59 (b)ââCorn masa productâ means a food product primarily made 60 from corn masa or corn masa flour. 61 (c)ââWhite rice productâ means a white rice or white rice 62 derived food product. 63 (3)(a)âAll enriched grain products, including wheat flour, 64 corn flour, breads, cereals, corn masa, corn masa flour, corn 65 masa products, and white rice products, offered for human 66 consumption in this state must contain folic acid. 67 1.âCorn masa flour must be enriched in an amount not less 68 than 0.7 milligrams of folic acid, within an acceptable industry 69 standard deviation of error, per pound of corn masa flour. 70 2.âA corn masa product or white rice product must be 71 enriched in an amount not less than 0.4 milligrams of folic 72 acid, within an acceptable industry standard deviation of error, 73 per pound of corn masa product or white rice product. 74 (b)âProducts under this subsection must be clearly labeled 75 as containing folic acid in accordance with United States Food 76 and Drug Administration guidelines. 77 (4)âThis section does not apply to products that are: 78 (a)âProduced by cottage food operations as defined in s. 79 500.03(1); or 80 (b)âCertified organic. 81 (5)âA violation of subsection (3) is grounds for 82 disciplinary action under s. 500.121. 83 (6)âThe department, in coordination with the Department of 84 Health, shall enforce this section. The departments may adopt 85 rules necessary to implement this section, including rules on 86 protocols for enriched grain products inspections and on grain 87 products enrichment compliance reporting. 88 Section 2.âThe Department of Health shall submit a report 89 to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of 90 Representatives by January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, 91 detailing the implementation of s. 500.072, Florida Statutes, 92 and any observed reduction in the incidence of neural tube 93 defects related to such implementation. 94 Section 3.âFor the 2026â2027 fiscal year, the sum of 95 $250,000 in nonrecurring funds is appropriated from the General 96 Revenue Fund to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 97 Services for the purpose of implementing s. 500.072, Florida 98 Statutes, including enriched grain products inspections and 99 public education efforts on public health benefits of the intake 100 of folic acid. 101 Section 4.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 102 act, this act shall take effect upon becoming a law.